Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska48-3002
Legislative findings and declarations.

The Legislature
hereby finds and declares that:

(1) Current
economic conditions in the state have resulted in unemployment, loss of jobs,
and difficulty in attracting new jobs; and

(2) It is the policy of the state to make
revisions in Nebraska's job training structure to encourage businesses to
promote the creation of and training for new jobs which can be performed in
the home within the state.

Laws 2010, LB1081, § 2.